verb/verb.xfst
# -*- coding: utf-8 -*-
################################################################################
# University of Zurich - Institute of Computational Linguistics
# Morphology anlysis for Romansh: Verbs
# Authors: Reto Baumgartner, Susanna Tron
# Date: June 2013
################################################################################

################################################################################
# Alphabet
################################################################################
define Vowel [a|e|i|o|u|à|è|é|ì|ò|ù];
define PlainVowel [a|e|i|o|u];
define Nonliquid [b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|m|n|p|q|s|t|v|w|x|z];
define Consonant [Nonliquid|r|l];
define Letter [Vowel|Consonant];

################################################################################
#                                                                              #
# Irregular and vowel-alternating verbs                                        #
#                                                                              #
# These verbs can be found in Caduff&Caprez article 127 (alternating verbs) or #
# 128 (irregular verbs)                                                        #
################################################################################
################################################################################
# Loading irregular and alternating verbs
################################################################################
# Irregular verb forms
read lexc  verb/verb-irr.lexc
define IrregularVerbRaw ;

# Forms of vowel-alternating verbs
read lexc  verb/verb-vchg.lexc
define ChangingVerbRaw ;

################################################################################
# Loading irregular past participle forms
################################################################################
# Irregular past participle forms
read lexc  verb/verb-part-irr.lexc
define PastPartIrregRaw;

################################################################################
#                                                                              #
# Regular verbs                                                                #
#                                                                              #
# These endings correspond to article 104 in Caduff&Caprez                     #
# The endings with -esch can be found in article 106 in Caduff&Caprez          #
# Verbs like 'currer' are explained in Caduff&Caprez article 108.              #
# Verbs like 'apparair' and 'absolver' are here seen as regular.               #
################################################################################
################################################################################
# Loading regular endings
################################################################################
# Endings for verbs like: gidar - jau gid
read lexc  verb/verb-ar-end.lexc
define VerbArEnd ;
# Endings for verbs like: gratular - jau gratulesch
read lexc  verb/verb-ar-esch-end.lexc
define VerbArEschEnd ;

# Endings for verbs like: temair - jau tem; vender - jau vend
read lexc  verb/verb-er-end.lexc
define VerbErEnd ;
# Endings for verbs like: absolver - jau absolvesch; apparair - jau apparesch
read lexc  verb/verb-er-esch-end.lexc
define VerbErEschEnd ;

# Endings for verbs like: partir - jau part; currer - jau cur (nus currin)
read lexc  verb/verb-ir-end.lexc
define VerbIrEnd ;
# Endings for verbs like: finir - jau finesch
read lexc  verb/verb-ir-esch-end.lexc
define VerbIrEschEnd ;

################################################################################
# Loading regular lemmata
################################################################################
# 2. conjugaziun according to Caduff et al
# Verbs like: temair - jau tem
define VerbAirInf @txt"wordlists/verb-air.txt" ;

# Verbs like: apparair - jau apparesch
define VerbAirEschInf  @txt"wordlists/verb-air-esch.txt" ;
# optional -esch morpheme
define VerbAirOptEschInf @txt"wordlists/verb-air-opt-esch.txt" ;


# 1. conjugaziun according to Caduff et al
# Verbs like: gidar - jau gid
define VerbArInf @txt"wordlists/verb-ar.txt" ;

# Verbs like: gratular - jau gratulesch
define VerbArEschInf @txt"wordlists/verb-ar-esch.txt" ;

# Verbs like: occupar - jau occup/occupesch
# optional -esch morpheme
define VerbArOptEschInf @txt"wordlists/verb-ar-opt-esch.txt" ;

# 3. conjugaziun according to Caduff et al
# Verbs like: vender - jau vend (nus vendain)
define VerbErInf  @txt"wordlists/verb-er.txt" ;

# Verbs like: currer - jau cur (but: nus currin)
define VerbEr2Inf @txt"wordlists/verb-er2.txt" ;

# Verbs like: absolver - jau absolvesch
define VerbErEschInf @txt"wordlists/verb-er-esch.txt" ;

# 4. conjugaziun according to Caduff et al
# Verbs like: partir - jau part
define VerbIrInf @txt"wordlists/verb-ir.txt" ;

# Verbs like: finir - jau finesch
define VerbIrEschInf  @txt"wordlists/verb-ir-esch.txt" ;

# Special Verbs with shortened infinitive
define ShortenedArEschInfinitiv [{beam}|{ambl}|{smatgargn}];
################################################################################
# Regular Verb Processing
################################################################################

# Deleting the infinitive ending to get the stems
define VerbAirStem [[VerbAirInf|VerbAirOptEschInf]
	.o. [{air} -> "@H" || _ .#.]];
define VerbArStem  [[VerbArInf|VerbArOptEschInf]
	.o. [{iar} -> "@I" || [{gl}|{g}] _ .#.]
	.o. [{ar}  -> "@H" || _ .#.]];
define VerbErStem  [VerbErInf
	.o. [{ier} -> "@I" || {gl} _ .#.]
	.o. [{er}  -> "@I" || _ .#.]]; 
define VerbEr2Stem [VerbEr2Inf
	.o. [{ier} -> "@I" || {gl} _ .#.]
	.o. [{er}  -> "@I" || _ .#.]];
define VerbIrStem  [VerbIrInf
	.o. [{ir}  -> "@I" || _ .#.]];
define VerbAirEschStem [[VerbAirEschInf|VerbAirOptEschInf]
	.o. [{air} -> "@H" || _ .#.]];
define VerbArEschStem  [ [VerbArEschInf|VerbArOptEschInf]
	.o. [ {iar} -> "@I" || [{gl}|{g}] _ .#. ]
	.o. [ {ar}  -> "@H" || _ .#. ]
	.o. [ [..] -> {ar} || .#. ShortenedArEschInfinitiv  _ "@H"] ];
define VerbErEschStem  [VerbErEschInf
	.o. [{ier} -> "@I" || {gl} _ .#.]
	.o. [{er}  -> "@I" || _ .#.]];
define VerbIrEschStem  [VerbIrEschInf
	.o. [{ir}  -> "@I" || _ .#.]];



# Adding the conjugation endings to the stems
define VerbAir [VerbAirStem VerbErEnd];
define VerbAr  [VerbArStem  VerbArEnd] ;
define VerbEr  [VerbErStem  VerbErEnd];
define VerbIr  [VerbIrStem  VerbIrEnd];
define VerbEr2 [VerbEr2Stem VerbIrEnd];
define VerbAirEsch [VerbAirEschStem VerbErEschEnd];
define VerbArEsch  [VerbArEschStem  VerbArEschEnd] ;
define VerbErEsch  [VerbErEschStem  VerbErEschEnd];
define VerbIrEsch  [VerbIrEschStem  VerbIrEschEnd];




# Defining the infinitve of the verbs
define Infinitive [
	[ VerbAirInf
	| VerbAirEschInf
	| VerbAirOptEschInf
	| VerbArEschInf
	| VerbArInf
	| VerbArOptEschInf
	| VerbEr2Inf
	| VerbErEschInf
	| VerbErInf
	| VerbIrEschInf
	| VerbIrInf
	]
	["+Verb"]:0 ["+Inf"]:0 ];

# Collection of all regular verbs for further processing
define RegularVerbRaw [
	Infinitive|
	VerbAir|
	VerbAr|
	VerbEr|
	VerbIr|
	VerbEr2|
	VerbAirEsch|
	VerbArEsch|
	VerbErEsch|
	VerbIrEsch];

################################################################################
#                                                                              #
# Guessing Verb Forms for Hypothetical Infinitives                             #
#                                                                              #
# This module modulates verbs to be able to analyse forms unknown to the       #
# system. Only the regular Forms from Caduff&Caprez articles 104 and 106 are   #
# included. The verbs like 'gratular - jau gratulesch' are restricted by their #
# endings.                                                                     #
################################################################################
# Verbs like: temair - jau tem
define VerbGuessAirInf    [ Letter* PlainVowel+ Consonant+ PlainVowel* {air} ];
# Verbs like: gidar - jau gid
define VerbGuessArInf     [ Letter* PlainVowel+ Consonant+ PlainVowel* {ar} ];
# Verbs like: vender - jau vend
define VerbGuessErInf     [ Letter* PlainVowel+ Consonant+ PlainVowel* {er} ];
# Verbs like: partir - jau part
define VerbGuessIrInf     [ Letter* PlainVowel+ Consonant+ PlainVowel* {ir} ];
# Verbs like: gratular - jau gratulesch
define VerbGuessArEschInf [ Letter* PlainVowel+ Consonant+ {ular}|{inar}|{isar}|{uar}|{iunar}|{iar} ];
# Verbs like: finir - jau finesch
define VerbGuessIrEschInf [ Letter* PlainVowel+ Consonant+ PlainVowel* {ir} ];



# Deleting the infinitive ending to get the stems
define VerbGuessAirStem [VerbGuessAirInf
	.o. [{air} -> "@H" || _ .#.]];
define VerbGuessArStem  [VerbGuessArInf
	.o. [{iar} -> "@I" || [{gl}|{g}] _ .#.]
	.o. [{ar}  -> "@H" || _ .#.]];
define VerbGuessErStem  [VerbGuessErInf
	.o. [{ier} -> "@I" || {gl} _ .#.]
	.o. [{er}  -> "@I" || _ .#.]];
define VerbGuessIrStem  [VerbGuessIrInf
	.o. [{ir}  -> "@I" || _ .#.]];
define VerbGuessArEschStem  [VerbGuessArEschInf
	.o. [{iar} -> "@I" || [{gl}|{g}] _ .#.]
	.o. [{ar}  -> "@H" || _ .#.]];
define VerbGuessIrEschStem  [VerbGuessIrEschInf
	.o. [{ir}  -> "@I" || _ .#.]];

# Adding the conjugation endings to the stems
define VerbGuessAir [VerbGuessAirStem VerbErEnd];
define VerbGuessAr  [VerbGuessArStem  VerbArEnd];
define VerbGuessEr  [VerbGuessErStem  VerbErEnd];
define VerbGuessIr  [VerbGuessIrStem  VerbIrEnd];
define VerbGuessArEsch  [VerbGuessArEschStem VerbArEschEnd];
define VerbGuessIrEsch  [VerbGuessIrEschStem VerbIrEschEnd];

# Defining the infinitve of the hypothetic verbs
define InfinitiveGuess [
	[VerbGuessAirInf|
	VerbGuessArInf|
	VerbGuessErInf|
	VerbGuessIrInf|
	VerbGuessArEschInf|
	VerbGuessIrEschInf]
	["+Verb"]:0 ["+Inf"]:0 ];

# Collection of hypothetic verb forms for further processing
define VerbGuessRaw [
	InfinitiveGuess|
	VerbGuessAir|
	VerbGuessAr|
	VerbGuessEr|
	VerbGuessIr|
	VerbGuessArEsch|
	VerbGuessIrEsch];
